Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 39

Fences

2-39-101. Kinds required for enclosures.

All fields and grounds kept for enclosures shall be enclosed with a fence.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 1; Acts 1899, No. 104, § 1, p. 168; C. & M. Dig., § 4645; Pope's Dig., § 5734; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1201; Acts 2001, No. 176, § 1.

2-39-102. Definition of fence.

As used in this chapter and all laws referring to this chapter, “fence” means a structure that is a boundary or barrier that limits human, livestock, or vehicle ingress or egress in an area.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; Acts 1899, No. 104, § 2, p. 168; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4646, 4647; Pope's Dig., §§ 5735, 5736; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1202, 78-1203; Acts 2001, No. 176, § 2; 2013, No. 960, § 1.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote this section.

2-39-103, 2-39-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning wire fences, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 176, § 3. The sections were derived from the following sources:

2-39-103. Acts 1881, No. 77, § 1, p. 145; 1889, No. 87, § 1, p. 117; C. & M. Dig., § 4648, Pope's Dig., § 5737, A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1204.

For present law, see §2-39-102.

2-39-105. Maintenance of division fences.

When any person encloses any land adjoining another's land already enclosed with a fence so that any part of the fence first made becomes the partition fence between them, then, in such case, the charge of the division fence, as far as it is enclosed on both sides, shall be equally borne and maintained by both parties.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 8; C. & M. Dig., § 4654; Pope's Dig., § 5743; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1210.

2-39-106. Sufficiency.

In all cases, the sufficiency of a fence shall be judged by the persons summoned to view the fence in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 4650; Pope's Dig., § 5739; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1206.

2-39-107. View of fence.

Upon the complaint of the party injured to any justice of the peace of the township, the justice shall issue an order to three (3) disinterested householders of the neighborhood not related to the parties, reciting the complaint and requiring them to view the fence where the trespass is complained of and take a memorandum of it. Their testimony in that case shall be good evidence on the trial touching the lawfulness of the fence.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 6; C. & M. Dig., § 4652; Pope's Dig., § 5741; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1208.

2-39-108. Animals breaking into enclosures.

If any horse, cattle, or other stock shall break into any enclosure or if any hog, pig, or shoat shall break into any enclosure, the owner of the creature shall:

For the first trespass, make reparation to the party injured for the true value of the damages he or she may have sustained;

For every trespass after the first trespass, double damages to be recovered with costs, before any justice of the peace or court having jurisdiction over the trespass, in the name of the injured party; and

For the third offense from any animal named breaking into the enclosure, the party injured may kill and destroy the animal so trespassing without being answerable for it.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Agricultural Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 403.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 5; C. & M. Dig., § 4651; Pope's Dig., § 5740; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1207; Acts 2001, No. 176, § 4.

2-39-109. Damage by motor vehicle.

In instances where a motor vehicle damages the fence or gate belonging to a person other than himself or herself and the damage allows livestock to escape, the owner of the livestock shall not be liable for damage caused by the livestock until he or she has had actual notice of their escape and a reasonable opportunity to repair the fence or gate and recover the livestock.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 498, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1207.1.

2-39-110. Liability for injuring animals.

If any person damaged for the want of a sufficient fence shall hurt, wound, lame, or kill, or cause the same thing to be done by shooting, hunting with a dog, or otherwise, any animal mentioned in this chapter, with the exception of a feral hog, the person shall be liable to the owner of the animal for double damages, with costs.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 76, § 7; C. & M. Dig., § 4653; Pope's Dig., § 5742; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1209; Acts 1999, No. 457, § 2.

2-39-111. Liability for damaging fence, etc.

A person who willfully cuts or otherwise damages the fence, gate, or gate lock of another shall be liable for triple damage plus attorney's fees and other costs.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 906, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1329.1.

2-39-104. Acts 1899, No. 100, § 1, p. 163; C. & M. Dig., § 4649; Pope's Dig., § 5738; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1205.